Hawaii statutes.
§201H-37 Exemption from tax on income and
obligations. Income earned and obligations issued by a nonprofit entity
determined to constitute a "public housing agency" pursuant to section
3(b)(6) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, and which income
and obligations are declared by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development to be exempt from all taxation imposed by the United States
pursuant to section 11(b) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, shall be
exempt from all taxation now or hereafter imposed by the State. [L 2006, c 180,
pt of §3; am l 2016, c 55, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next